Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2424.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1725-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1725-A. Funding for Charter Schools.--* * *(f) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, the following shall apply:(1) Whether a charter school entity or the parent or guardian initiates a request for an initial evaluation to determine if the student is a student with a disability under 34 CFR 300.306 (relating to determination of eligibility) and 22 Pa. Code § 14.123 (relating to evaluation), the evaluation shall 12345678910111213141516171819 be conducted by the student's school district of residence. The school district of residence may contract with the intermediate unit to fulfill the responsibilities under this subsection.(2) The school district of residence or intermediate unit performing the evaluation under paragraph (1) shall issue a report of the initial evaluation findings to the student's parents or guardians and the charter school entity. The following shall apply:(i) The evaluation report shall include:(A) A decision about whether the student is eligible to receive special education services.(B) Recommendations to the individualized education program team about the special education and related services the child needs to participate in the regular curriculum if the student is eligible for special education services.(ii) The report shall be used by the individualized education program team to make decisions about services to be provided to the student by the charter school entity.(iii) The report by the school district or intermediate unit shall not impede the parents' or guardians' right to have an independent evaluation of the student performed under 34 CFR 300.502 (relating to independent educational evaluation).(3) An intermediate unit may charge a fee to the charter school entity for the evaluation service, which may not be more than the intermediate unit charges a school district for a similar service.(4) For purposes of this act, the charter school entity shall remain the local education agency responsible for the provision of special education services under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (Public Law 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 20260HB2424PN3225 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1400 et seq.) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 711 (relating to charter school and cyber charter school services and programs for children with disabilities).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2424PN3225 - 3 - 1234